District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.45

Authority to retain administrator.

(a)

The Mayor may contract with an administrator to administer the Energy Efficiency Loan program created by this subchapter.

(b)

Chapter 3A of Title 2 [§ 2-351.01 et seq.] shall not apply to the contract authorized by subsection (a) of this section until 5 years after the effective date of the initial contract to retain an administrator.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 305, 57 DCR 3406
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 224(b), 59 DCR 6190
Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 102(i), 60 DCR 1300
This section is referenced in § 8-1778.01.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “§ 2-301.01 et seq.” in (b).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-262 rewrote (b).
Section 206 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 206. Authority to retain administrator.
“(a) The Mayor may contract with an administrator to administer the energy efficiency loan program created by this title.
“(b) The District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985, effective February 21, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 2-301.01 et seq.), shall not apply to the contract authorized by subsection (a) of this section until 3 years after the effective date of this act.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).